West Virginia, session 2026, HB5323.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2.  WILDLIFE RESOURCES. §20-2-42.  Indexing of license and stamp fees. The director may propose rules for legislative approval in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code, changing any license or stamp fee set forth in this article or in §20-2B-1 et seq. of this code. All increases in license and stamp fees in this article or in §20-2B-1 et seq. of this code, set forth in rule, shall be computed in a manner that indexes the increases to the Consumer Price Index (All Items) published by the United States Department of Labor rounded down to the nearest dollar. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home